algorithms/rule110.sbl
externals ( stem )
integers ( x )
routines ( zero one )

// TODO: last bit is basically not handled at all
define zero as (
  (['0'] ('0' and (<- '0' $x = 0))) or
  (['0'] ('1' and (<- '1' $x = 0))) or
  (['1'] ('0' and (<- '1' $x = 1))) or
  (['1'] ('1' and (<- '1' $x = 1)))
)
define one as (
  (['0'] ('0' and (<- '0' $x = 0))) or
  (['0'] ('1' and (<- '1' $x = 0))) or
  (['1'] ('0' and (<- '1' $x = 1))) or
  (['1'] ('1' and (<- '0' $x = 1)))
)

define stem as (
  // TODO: It would be better to handle the first 3 bits as if there is permanent 0 before the first one.
  ('0' $x = 0) or ('1' $x = 1)
  repeat (
    ($x == 0 zero) or ($x == 1 one)
  )
)
